Illinois, session 104th, HB3638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workplace Transparency Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1-5, 1-10, 1-15, 1-20, 1-25, 1-30, 1-35, and 61-40 as follows: 7    (820 ILCS 96/1-5)8    Sec. 1-5. Purpose. This State has a compelling and 9substantial interest in securing individuals' freedom from 10unlawful discrimination and harassment in the workplace. This 11State also recognizes the right of parties to freely contract 12over the terms, privileges and conditions of employment as 13they so choose. The purpose of this Act is to ensure that all 14parties to a contract for the performance of services 15understand and agree to the mutual promises and consideration 16therein, and to protect the interest of this State in ensuring 17all workplaces are free of unlawful discrimination, and 18harassment, and violations of State or federal employment 19laws.20(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 21    (820 ILCS 96/1-10)22    Sec. 1-10. Application.   HB3638 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1    (a) This Act does not apply to any collective bargaining 2agreements contracts that are entered into in and subject to 3the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act or the National Labor 4Relations Act. If there is a conflict between any valid and 5enforceable collective bargaining agreement and this Act, the 6collective bargaining agreement controls. 7    (b) This Act shall have no effect on the determination of 8whether an employment relationship exists for the purposes of 9other State or federal laws, including, but not limited to, 10the Illinois Human Rights Act, the Workers' Compensation Act, 11the Unemployment Insurance Act, and the Illinois Wage Payment 12and Collection Act. 13    (c) This Act applies to contracts entered into, modified, 14or extended on or after the effective date of this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 16    (820 ILCS 96/1-15)17    Sec. 1-15. Definitions. As used in this Act:18    "Concerted activity" means activities engaged in for the 19purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or 20protection as provided in 29 U.S.C. 157 et seq., as it existed 21on January 19, 2025, and the Illinois Education Labor 22Relations Act, Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, and Labor 23Dispute Act. 24    "Employee" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 252-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. "Employee" includes   HB3638 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1"nonemployees" as defined in Section 2-102 of the Illinois 2Human Rights Act.3    "Employer" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 42-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.5    "Mutual condition of employment or continued employment" 6means any contract, agreement, clause, covenant, or waiver 7negotiated between an employer and an employee or prospective 8employee in good faith for consideration in order to obtain or 9retain employment.10    "Prospective employee" means a person seeking to enter an 11employment contract with an employer.12    "Settlement agreement" means an agreement, contract, or 13clause within an agreement or contract entered into between an 14employee, prospective employee, or former employee and an 15employer to resolve a dispute or legal claim between the 16parties that arose or accrued before the settlement agreement 17was executed.18    "Termination agreement" means a contract or agreement 19between an employee and an employer terminating the employment 20relationship.21    "Unlawful employment practice" means any practice made 22unlawful that is form of unlawful discrimination, harassment, 23or retaliation that is actionable under Article 2 of the 24Illinois Human Rights Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 251964, or any other related State or federal rule or law 26governing employment, including those that are is enforced by   HB3638 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1the Illinois Department of Human Rights, Illinois Department 2of Labor, Illinois Labor Relations Board, or the Equal 3Employment Opportunity Commission, United States Department of 4Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, or 5National Labor Relations Board.6    "Unilateral condition of employment or continued 7employment" means any contract, agreement, clause, covenant, 8or waiver an employer requires an employee or prospective 9employee to accept as a non-negotiable material term in order 10to obtain or retain employment.11(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 12    (820 ILCS 96/1-20)13    Sec. 1-20. Reporting of allegations. No contract, 14agreement, clause, covenant, waiver, or other document shall 15prohibit, prevent, or otherwise restrict an employee, 16prospective employee, or former employee from (1) reporting 17any allegations of unlawful conduct to federal, State, or 18local officials for investigation, including, but not limited 19to, alleged criminal conduct or unlawful employment practices, 20or (2) engaging in concerted activity to address work-related 21issues.22(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 23    (820 ILCS 96/1-25)24    Sec. 1-25. Conditions of employment or continued   HB3638 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1employment. 2    (a) Any agreement, clause, covenant, or waiver that is a 3unilateral condition of employment or continued employment and 4has the purpose or effect of preventing an employee or 5prospective employee from making truthful statements or 6disclosures about alleged unlawful employment practices or 7engaging in protected concerted activity to address 8work-related issues is against public policy, void to the 9extent it prevents such statements or disclosures, and 10severable from an otherwise valid and enforceable contract 11under this Act.12    (b) Any agreement, clause, covenant, or waiver that is a 13unilateral condition of employment or continued employment and 14requires the employee or prospective employee to waive, 15arbitrate, or otherwise diminish any existing or future claim, 16right, or benefit related to an unlawful employment practice 17to which the employee or prospective employee would otherwise 18be entitled under any provision of State or federal law, 19including that which purports to shorten the applicable 20statute of limitation, apply non-Illinois law to an Illinois 21employee's claim, or require a venue outside of Illinois to 22adjudicate an Illinois employee's claim, is against public 23policy, void to the extent it denies an employee or 24prospective employee a substantive or procedural right or 25remedy related to alleged unlawful employment practices, and 26severable from an otherwise valid and enforceable contract   HB3638 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1under this Act.2    (c) Any agreement, clause, covenant, or waiver that is a 3mutual condition of employment or continued employment may 4include provisions that would otherwise be against public 5policy as a unilateral condition of employment or continued 6employment, but only if the agreement, clause, covenant, or 7waiver is in writing, demonstrates actual, knowing, and 8bargained-for consideration from both parties, and 9acknowledges the right of the employee or prospective employee 10to:11        (1) report any good faith allegation of unlawful 12    employment practices to any appropriate federal, State, or 13    local government agency enforcing discrimination laws;14        (2) report any good faith allegation of criminal 15    conduct to any appropriate federal, State, or local 16    official;17        (3) participate in a proceeding related to unlawful 18    employment practices, including any litigation brought by 19    any federal, State, or local government agency or any 20    other person who alleges that the employer has violated 21    any State, federal, or local law, regulation, or rule with 22    any appropriate federal, State, or local government agency 23    enforcing discrimination laws;24        (4) make any truthful statements or disclosures 25    required by law, regulation, or legal process; and26        (5) request or receive confidential legal advice; and   HB3638 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1    .2        (6) engage in concerted activity to address 3    work-related issues.4    (d) Failure to comply with the provisions of subsection 5(c) shall establish a rebuttable presumption that the 6agreement, clause, covenant, or waiver is a unilateral 7condition of employment or continued employment that is 8governed by subsection (a) or (b).9    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent 10an employee or prospective employee and an employer from 11negotiating and bargaining over the terms, privileges, and 12conditions of employment.13(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (820 ILCS 96/1-30)15    Sec. 1-30. Settlement or termination agreements. 16    (a) An employee, prospective employee, or former employee 17and an employer may enter into a valid and enforceable 18settlement or termination agreement that includes promises of 19confidentiality related to alleged unlawful employment 20practices, other than future or prospective concerted activity 21related to workplace conditions, so long as:22        (1) confidentiality is the documented preference of 23    the employee, prospective employee, or former employee and 24    is mutually beneficial to both parties;25        (2) the employer notifies the employee, prospective   HB3638 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1    employee, or former employee, in writing, of his or her 2    right to have an attorney or representative of his or her 3    choice review the settlement or termination agreement 4    before it is executed;5        (3) there is valid, bargained for consideration in 6    exchange for the confidentiality separate from any 7    consideration that is provided in exchange for a release 8    of claims;9        (4) the settlement or termination agreement does not 10    waive any claims of unlawful employment practices that 11    accrue after the date of execution of the settlement or 12    termination agreement;13        (5) the settlement or termination agreement is 14    provided, in writing, to the parties to the prospective 15    agreement and the employee, prospective employee, or 16    former employee is given a period of 21 calendar days to 17    consider the agreement before execution, during which the 18    employee, prospective employee, or former employee may 19    sign the agreement at any time, knowingly and voluntarily 20    waiving any further time for consideration; and21        (6) unless knowingly and voluntarily waived by the 22    employee, prospective employee, or former employee, he or 23    she has 7 calendar days following the execution of the 24    agreement to revoke the agreement and the agreement is not 25    effective or enforceable until the revocation period has 26    expired.  HB3638 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1    (b) An employer may not unilaterally include any clause in 2a settlement or termination agreement that prohibits the 3employee, prospective employee, or former employee from making 4truthful statements or disclosures regarding unlawful 5employment practices or unilaterally include any clause in a 6settlement or termination agreement that states that the 7promises of confidentiality are the preference of the 8employee.9    (c) Failure to comply with the provisions of this Section 10shall render any promise of confidentiality related to alleged 11unlawful employment practices against public policy void and 12severable from an otherwise valid and enforceable agreement.13    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent 14a mutually agreed upon settlement or termination agreement 15from waiving or releasing the employee, prospective employee, 16or former employee's right to seek or obtain any remedies or 17relief of any kind relating to an unlawful employment practice 18claim that occurred before the date on which the agreement is 19executed.20(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 21    (820 ILCS 96/1-35)22    Sec. 1-35. Consequential damages, costs, Costs and 23attorney's fees. An employee, prospective employee, or former 24employee shall be entitled to consequential damages, in 25addition to reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in   HB3638 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 12137 SPS 22236 b1challenging a contract for violation of this Act upon a final, 2non-appealable action in favor of the employee, prospective 3employee, or former employee on the question of the validity 4and enforceability of the contract or defending an action for 5breach of a confidentiality agreement pursuant to this Act.6(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 7    (820 ILCS 96/1-40)8    Sec. 1-40. Right to testify. Notwithstanding any other 9law to the contrary, any agreement, clause, covenant, or 10waiver, settlement agreement, or termination agreement that 11waives the right of an employee, prospective employee, or 12former employee to testify in an administrative, legislative, 13arbitral, or judicial proceeding, including a deposition taken 14in connection with any of the proceedings, concerning alleged 15criminal conduct or alleged unlawful employment practices on 16the part of the other party to the employment contract, 17settlement agreement, or termination agreement, or on the part 18of the party's agents or employees, when the employee, 19prospective employee, or former employee has been required or 20requested to attend the proceeding pursuant to a court order, 21subpoena, or written request from an administrative agency or 22the legislature, is void and unenforceable under the public 23policy of this State. This Section is declarative of existing 24law.25(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.)